Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 1. In General

§ 40-14-401.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “Uniform Consumer Credit Code — Insurance.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-101; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-101

.

Cross references. —

As to insurance generally, see title 26.

Cited

in

Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes Truth in Lending Act violation which “was not intentional and resulted from bona fide error notwithstanding maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid any such error” within meaning of § 130(c) of Act (15 USC § 1640(c)) 153 ALR Fed 193.

§ 40-14-402.
Scope.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (d) of this section, this article applies to insurance provided or to be provided in relation to a consumer credit sale (W.S.

40-14-204

), a consumer lease (W.S.

40-14-206

) or a consumer loan (W.S.

40-14-304

).

The provision on cancellation by a creditor (W.S.

40-14-453

) applies to loans the primary purpose of which is the financing of insurance. No other provision of this article applies to insurance so financed.

This article supplements and does not repeal W.S.

26-21-101

through

26-22-101

. The provisions of this act concerning administrative controls, liabilities, and penalties do not apply to persons acting as insurers, and the similar provisions of W.S.

26-21-101

through

26-21-114

and

26-23-201

do not apply to creditors and debtors.

W.S.

40-14-454

applies to insurance and other products that provide protection to a consumer and that terminate upon prepayment, default or other circumstances that end an agreement, including guaranteed asset protection waivers and debt cancellation contracts.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-102; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-102

; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), substituted "subsections (b) and (d)" for "subsection (b)" and made a stylistic change; and added (d).

§ 40-14-403.
Definitions.

In this act:

“Consumer credit insurance” means insurance, other than insurance on property, by which the satisfaction of debt in whole or in part is a benefit provided, but does not include:

Insurance provided in relation to a credit transaction in which a payment is scheduled more than ten (10) years after the extension of credit;

Insurance issued as an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to an agreement or plan for insuring debtors of the creditor; or

Insurance indemnifying the creditor against loss due to the debtor’s default.

“Credit Insurance Act” means W.S.

26-21-101

through

26-21-114

and

26-23-201

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-103; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-103

.

Cross references. —

As to the rebate upon prepayment, see §§ 40-14-221(f) and 40-14-319(f).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-404.
Creditor's provision of and charge for insurance; excess amount of charge.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and subject to the provisions on additional charges (W.S.

40-14-213

and

40-14-311

) and maximum charges (part 2 of article 2 and article 3), a creditor may agree to provide insurance, and may contract for and receive a charge for insurance separate from and in addition to other charges. A creditor need not make a separate charge for insurance provided or required by him. This act does not authorize the issuance of any insurance prohibited under any statute, or rule thereunder, governing the business of insurance.

The excess amount of a charge for insurance provided for in agreements in violation of this article is an excess charge for the purposes of the provisions of the article on remedies and penalties (article 5) as to effect of violations on rights of parties (W.S.

40-14-521

) and of the provisions of the article on administration (article 6) as to civil actions by the administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-104; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-104

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-405.
Conditions applying to insurance to be provided by creditor.

If a creditor agrees with a debtor to provide insurance:

The insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy or certificate of insurance delivered to the debtor, or sent to him at his address as stated by him, within thirty (30) days after the term of the insurance commences under the agreement between the creditor and debtor; or

The creditor shall promptly notify the debtor of any failure or delay in providing the insurance.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-105; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-105

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-14-406.
Unconscionability.

In applying the provisions of this act on unconscionability (W.S.

40-14-508

and

40-14-611

) to a separate charge for insurance, consideration shall be given, among other factors, to:

Potential benefits to the debtor including the satisfaction of his obligations;

The creditor’s need for the protection provided by the insurance; and

The relation between the amount and terms of credit granted and the insurance benefits provided.

If consumer credit insurance otherwise complies with this article and other applicable law, neither the amount nor the term of the insurance nor the amount of a charge therefor is in itself unconscionable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-106; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-106

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-407.
Maximum charge by creditor for insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance, the amount charged to the debtor for the insurance may not exceed the premium to be charged by the insurer, as computed at the time the charge to the debtor is determined, conforming to any rate filings required by law and made by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance.

A creditor who provides consumer credit insurance in relation to a revolving charge account (W.S.

40-14-208

) or revolving loan account (W.S.

40-14-308

) may calculate the charge to the debtor in each billing cycle by applying the current premium rate to:

The average daily unpaid balance of the debt in the cycle;

The unpaid balance of the debt or a median amount within a specified range of unpaid balances of debt on approximately the same day of the cycle. The day of the cycle need not be the day used in calculating the credit service charge (W.S.

40-14-218

) or loan finance charge (W.S.

40-14-310

), but the specified range shall be the range used for that purpose; or

The unpaid balances of principal calculated according to the actuarial method.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-107; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-107

; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to filing of policies with insurance commissioner, see §

26-21-108

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(ii), inserted “charge” following “or loan finance.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "(W.S.

40-14-310

)" for "(W.S.

40-14-310

and

40-14-348

)" in (b)(ii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 40-14-408.
Refund or credit required; amount.

Upon prepayment in full of a consumer credit sale or consumer loan by the proceeds of consumer credit insurance, the debtor or his estate is entitled to a refund of any portion of a separate charge for insurance which by reason of prepayment is retained by the creditor or returned to him by the insurer unless the charge was computed from time to time on the basis of the balances of the debtor’s account.

This article does not require a creditor to grant a refund or credit to the debtor if all refunds and credits due to the debtor under this article amount to less than one dollar ($1.00), and except as provided in subsection (a) of this section does not require the creditor to account to the debtor for any portion of a separate charge for insurance because:

The insurance is terminated by performance of the insurer’s obligation;

The creditor pays or accounts for premiums to the insurer in amounts and at times determined by the agreement between them; or

The creditor receives directly or indirectly under any policy of insurance a gain or advantage not prohibited by law.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the creditor shall promptly make or cause to be made an appropriate refund or credit to the debtor with respect to any separate charge made to him for insurance if:

The insurance is not provided or is provided for a shorter term than that for which the charge to the debtor for insurance was computed; or

The insurance terminates prior to the end of the term for which it was written because of prepayment in full or otherwise.

A refund or credit required by subsection (c) of this section is appropriate as to amount if it is computed according to a method prescribed or approved by the commissioner of insurance or a formula filed by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance at least thirty (30) days before the debtor’s right to a refund or credit becomes determinable, unless the method or formula is employed after the commissioner of insurance notifies the insurer that he disapproves it.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-108; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-108

.

§ 40-14-409.
Existing insurance; choice of insurer.

If a creditor requires insurance, upon notice to the creditor the debtor shall have the option of providing the required insurance through an existing policy of insurance owned or controlled by the debtor, or through a policy to be obtained and paid for by the debtor, but the creditor may for reasonable cause decline the insurance provided by the debtor. The creditor shall promptly notify the debtor of his rights under this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-109; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-109

.

§ 40-14-410.
Charge for insurance in connection with a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation; duplicate charges.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance in connection with a deferral (W.S.

40-14-215

or

40-14-313

), a refinancing (W.S.

40-14-216

or

40-14-314

), or a consolidation (W.S.

40-14-217

or

40-14-315

), unless:

The debtor agrees at or before the time of the deferral, refinancing, or consolidation that the charge may be made;

The debtor is or is to be provided with insurance for an amount or a term, or insurance of a kind, in addition to that to which he would have been entitled had there been no deferral, refinancing, or consolidation;

The debtor receives a refund or credit on account of any unexpired term of existing insurance in the amount that would be required if the insurance were terminated (W.S.

40-14-408

); and

The charge does not exceed the amount permitted by this article (W.S.

40-14-407

).

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance which duplicates insurance with respect to which the creditor has previously contracted for or received a separate charge.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-110; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-110

.

§ 40-14-411.
Cooperation between administrator and commissioner of insurance.

The administrator and the commissioner of insurance are authorized and directed to consult and assist one another in maintaining compliance with this article. They may jointly pursue investigations, prosecute suits, and take other official action, as may seem to them appropriate, if either of them is otherwise empowered to take the action. If the administrator is informed of a violation or suspected violation by an insurer of this article, or of the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state, he shall advise the commissioner of insurance of the circumstances.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-111; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-111

.

Cross references. —

As to the insurance commissioner generally, see chapter 2 of title 26.

§ 40-14-412.
Administrative action of commissioner of insurance.

The Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act applies to and governs all administrative action taken by the commissioner of insurance pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 4-112; W.S. 1957, §

40-4-112

.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).